Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

Agreements with Governmental Agencies

7-52-201. Agreements with governmental agencies.

Any municipal corporation, county, city or town, called “municipality” in this part, owning or operating or authorized to acquire or operate any electric generation, transmission or distribution system, is authorized, in any contract or arrangement with the Tennessee Valley authority or any similar governmental agency for the acquisition of any such system or part of a system or the purchase of electric power and energy, to stipulate and agree to such covenants, terms and conditions as the governing body of the municipality may deem appropriate, including, but not limited to, covenants, terms and conditions in respect to the resale rates, financial and accounting methods, services, operation and maintenance practices and the manner of disposing of the revenues, of any such system, and to comply therewith, and any such covenants, terms or conditions heretofore stipulated or agreed to are hereby expressly validated.

Acts 1935, ch. 37, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.90 (Williams, § 3708.96); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1535.

7-52-202. Agreement power as supplemental.

Nothing contained in this part shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any authority, power or right that any municipality may have in the absence of this part. These sections shall be construed as cumulative and shall be in addition and supplemental to any power, authority or right conferred by any other law.

Acts 1935, ch. 37, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.91 (Williams, § 3708.97); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1536.

7-52-203. Law as remedial.

This part is remedial in nature and any power, authority or right hereby conferred shall be liberally construed, and, to this end, every municipality shall have the power, authority and right, in addition to those expressly conferred by this part, to do all things necessary or convenient in carrying out the purposes of this part.

Acts 1935, ch. 37, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.92 (Williams, § 3708.98); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1537.